Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.220

Application—Format.

(1) The secretary of state shall specify by rule the format of all voter registration applications. These applications shall be compatible with existing voter registration records. An applicant for voter registration shall be required to complete only one application and to provide the required information other than the applicant's signature no more than one time. These applications shall also contain instructions for the voter to use the form to update information related to the voter's voter registration.

(2) Any application format specified by the secretary for use in registering to vote in state and local elections shall satisfy the requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31) and the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252) for registering to vote in federal elections.

[ 2023 c 466 s 7; 2013 c 11 s 13; 2004 c 267 s 115; 2003 c 111 s 217. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 18; 1990 c 143 s 9; 1973 1st ex.s. c 21 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 18; 1965 c 9 s 29.07.140; prior: (i) 1933 c 1 s 30; RRS s 5114-30. (ii) 1933 c 1 s 13, part; RRS s 5114-13, part. Formerly RCW 29.07.140.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—1994 c 57: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.